Georgia statutes. 
(5) A dispute over the award of a contract under this article shall be resolved by the filing of a petition in the superior court of the county in which the lead local authority is located within 30 days of the awarding of such contract and shall be determined through the use of a special master appointed by the judge of the superior court of the county in which the lead local authority is located. The decision of the special master with regard to such dispute shall be appealable for a de novo review to the superior court of the county in which the lead local authority is located within 30 days following the decision of the special master. Neither the special master nor the superior court shall be authorized to enjoin or otherwise delay or suspend the execution of the contract and any work to be performed under such contract.

(6) Nothing in this Code section shall require the designated representatives, the lead local authority, or any local governing authority, local authority, or state agency or authority to continue negotiations or discussions arising out of any request for proposal.

(7) Every local governing authority and local authority shall be authorized to promulgate reasonable rules or regulations to assist in its evaluation of proposals and to implement the purposes of this article.

(d) No public officer, employee, or member of a local governing authority or local authority, with respect to contracts of such local governing authority or local authority, or the General Assembly shall serve as an agent, lobbyist, or board member for any private entity directly or indirectly under a contract or negotiating a contract provided for by this article for three years after leaving his or her position as a public officer, employee, or member of the local governing authority, local authority, or the General Assembly.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-102, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 52, § 1/SB 122; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 36/HB 942.)

——————————

ARTICLE 5

PARTNERSHIP FOR PUBLIC FACILITIES AND INFRASTRUCTURE

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2015, p. 406, § 1/SB 59, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "This Act shall be known and may be cited as the 'Partnership for Public Facilities and Infrastructure Act.'"

36-91-110. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this article, the term:

(1) "Comprehensive agreement" means the written agreement between the private entity and the local government required by Code Section 36-91-115.

(2) "Develop" or "development" means to plan, design, develop, finance, lease, acquire, install, construct, operate, maintain, or expand.

(3) "Local authority" means any local authority created pursuant to a local or general Act of the General Assembly, including a joint public instrumentality.

(4) "Local government" means any county, municipality, consolidated government, or board of education.

(5) "Private entity" means any natural person, corporation, general partnership, limited liability company, limited partnership, joint venture, business trust, public benefit corporation, nonprofit entity, or other business entity.

(6) "Qualifying project" means any project selected in response to a request from a local government or submitted by a private entity as an unsolicited proposal in accordance with this article and subsequently reviewed and approved by a local government, within its sole discretion, as meeting a public purpose or public need. This term shall not include and shall have no application to any project involving:

(A) The generation of electric energy for sale pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 46;

(B) Communications services pursuant to Articles 4 and 7 of Chapter 5 of Title 46;

(C) Cable and video services pursuant to Chapter 76 of this title; or

(D) Water reservoir projects as defined in paragraph (10) of Code Section 12-5-471, which shall be governed by Article 4 of this chapter.

(7) "Revenue" means all revenues, income, earnings, user fees, lease payments, or other service payments arising out of or in connection with supporting the development or operation of a qualifying project.

(8) "Unsolicited proposal" means a written proposal for a qualifying project that is received by a local government and is not in response to any request for proposal for a qualifying project issued by a local government.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-110, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 406, § 2/SB 59.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For annual survey of administrative law, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2015).

36-91-111. Creation of Partnership for Public Facilities and Infrastructure Act Guidelines Committee; membership; terms; allowances; duties; support.

Statute text

(a) The Partnership for Public Facilities and Infrastructure Act Guidelines Committee is established to prepare model guidelines for local governments in the implementation of this article.

(b) The committee shall be composed of ten persons. Except for the local government officials or staff appointed to the committee, each committee member shall have subject matter expertise in architecture, construction management, engineering, finance, or real estate development. These appointments shall be made as follows:

(1) The following members shall be appointed by the Governor:

(A) One member or employee of a county governing authority;

(B) One member or employee of a municipal governing authority;

(C) One member or employee of a local board of education; and

(D) One licensed member of the State Bar of Georgia with expertise in representing local government in public works construction.

(2) The following members shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, provided that one of these appointees shall have expertise in working with local government:

(A) One member of the business community with expertise in construction management employed by a firm with less than $25 million in annual revenue;

(B) One member of the business community who is a licensed architect; and

(C) One member of the business community with expertise in real estate development; and

(3) The following members shall be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor, provided that one of these appointees shall have expertise in working with local government:

(A) One member of the business community with expertise in construction management employed by a firm with more than $25 million in annual revenue;

(B) One member of the business community who is a licensed professional engineer; and

(C) One member of the business community with expertise in finance.

(c) The terms of these committee appointments shall be for two years. At least three of these appointees shall reside outside of the metropolitan Atlanta area. The appointments shall be made as soon as feasible, but not later than August 1, 2015. The committee shall meet once a month or as needed and shall issue model guidelines to local governments no later than July 1, 2016. Such guidelines shall be updated every two years. The members of the committee shall elect a chairperson and a vice chairperson who shall serve for two-year terms in such office.

(d) Citizen members shall receive a daily expense allowance in the amount specified in subsection (b) of Code Section 45-7-21 as well as the mileage or transportation allowance authorized for state employees.

(e) Staff support shall be provided by the Department of Administrative Services, the Governor's office, and the Office of Planning and Budget.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-111, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 406, § 2/SB 59.)

36-91-112. Model guidelines.

Statute text

(a) Prior to executing any comprehensive agreement for the development or operation of a qualifying project pursuant to an unsolicited proposal received by a local government under this article, the local government shall adopt either:

(1) The model guidelines from the Partnership for Public Facilities and Infrastructure Act Guidelines Committee; or

(2) Its own guidelines as a policy, rule, regulation, or ordinance, which shall contain each of the factors identified in subsection (b) of this Code section.

(b) The model guidelines shall include, at a minimum, the following:

(1) The period of time each calendar year when the local government will consider receiving, processing, reviewing, or evaluating unsolicited proposals for qualifying projects, and such limited time period shall be established within the sole discretion of the local government;

(2) Procedures for the financial review and analysis of an unsolicited proposal that may include:

(A) A cost-benefit analysis;

(B) Evaluation of the public need for or benefit derived from the qualifying project;

(C) Evaluation of the estimated cost of the qualifying project for reasonableness in relation to similar facilities;

(D) Evaluation of the source of funding for the project;

(E) Consideration of plans to ensure timely development or operation;

(F) Evaluation of risk sharing, including cost or completion guarantees, added value, or debt or equity investments by the private entity; and

(G) Consideration of any increase in funding, dedicated revenue source, or other economic benefit that would not otherwise be available;

(3) Criteria for determining any fees authorized in Code Section 36-91-113 that the local government elects to charge the private entity for the processing, review, and evaluation of an unsolicited proposal;

(4) A requirement for the issuance of a request for proposals upon a decision by the local government to proceed with a qualifying project pursuant to an unsolicited proposal;

(5) Procedures for posting and publishing notice of the opportunity to offer competing proposals;

(6) Procedures for the processing, review, and consideration of competing proposals, and the period for the processing, review, and consideration of competing proposals shall not be less than 90 days;

(7) Procedures for determining whether information included in an unsolicited proposal shall be released as part of any request for proposals to ensure fair competition; and

(8) Procedures for identifying and appointing an independent owner adviser to the local government with expertise in architecture, engineering, or construction management to assist in the evaluation of an unsolicited proposal and to serve as owner adviser to the local government if the local government chooses to pursue any ensuing solicited bid process. The local government shall not be obligated to engage such services.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-112, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 406, § 2/SB 59.)

36-91-113. Unsolicited proposals.

Statute text

(a) If a local government adopts a rule, regulation, or ordinance affirming its participation in the process created in this article, a private entity may submit an unsolicited proposal for a project to the local government for review and determination as a qualifying project in accordance with the guidelines established by the local government. Any such unsolicited proposal shall be accompanied by the following material and information:

(1) A project description, including the location of the project, the conceptual design of such facility or facilities, and a conceptual plan for the provision of services or technology infrastructure;

(2) A feasibility statement that includes:

(A) The method by which the private entity proposes to secure any necessary property interests required for the project;

(B) A list of all permits and approvals required for the project from local, state, or federal agencies; and

(C) A list of public utility facilities, if any, that will be crossed by the project and a statement of the plans of the private entity to accommodate such crossings;

(3) A schedule for the initiation and completion of the project to include the proposed major responsibilities and timeline for activities to be performed by both the local government and private entity as well as a proposed schedule for obtaining the permits and approvals required in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of this subsection;

(4) A financial plan setting forth the private entity's general plans for financing the project, including the sources of the private entity's funds and identification of any dedicated revenue source or proposed debt or equity investment on behalf of the private entity; a description of user fees, lease payments, and other service payments over the term of the comprehensive agreement pursuant to Code Section 36-91-115; and the methodology and circumstances for changes to such user fees, lease payments, and other service payments over time;

(5) A business case statement that shall include a basic description of any direct and indirect benefits that the private entity can provide in delivering the project, including relevant cost, quality, methodology, and process for identifying the project and time frame data;

(6) The names and addresses of the persons who may be contacted for further information concerning the unsolicited proposal; and

(7) Such additional material and information as the local government may reasonably request.

(b) For any unsolicited proposal of the development of a project received by a local government, the local government may charge and retain a reasonable fee to cover the costs of processing, reviewing, and evaluating the unsolicited proposal, including, without limitation, reasonable attorney's fees and fees for financial, technical, and other necessary advisers or consultants.

(c) The local government may reject any proposal or unsolicited proposal at any time and shall not be required to provide a reason for its denial. If the local government rejects a proposal or unsolicited proposal submitted by a private entity, it shall have no obligation to return the proposal, unsolicited proposal, or any related materials following such rejection.

(d) A private entity assumes all risk in submission of a proposal or unsolicited proposal in accordance with subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, and a local government shall not incur any obligation to reimburse a private entity for any costs, damages, or loss of intellectual property incurred by a private entity in the creation, development, or submission of a proposal or unsolicited proposal for a qualifying project.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-113, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 406, § 2/SB 59.)

36-91-114. Approval process.

Statute text

(a) The local government may approve the project in an unsolicited proposal submitted by a private entity pursuant to Code Section 36-91-113 as a qualifying project. Determination by the local government of a qualifying project shall not bind the local government or the private entity to proceed with the qualifying project.

(b) Upon the local government's determination of a qualifying project as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, the local government shall:

(1) Seek competing proposals for the qualifying project by issuing a request for proposals for not less than 90 days; and

(2) Review all proposals submitted in response to the request for proposals based on the criteria established in the request for proposals.

(c) When the time for receiving proposals expires, the local government shall first rank the proposals in accordance with the factors set forth in the request for proposal or invitation for bids. The local government shall not be required to select the proposal with the lowest price offer, but it may consider price as one of various factors in evaluating the proposals received in response to the request for proposals for a qualifying project. Factors that may be considered include:

(1) The proposed cost of the qualifying project;

(2) The general reputation, industry experience, and financial capacity of the private entity;

(3) The proposed design of the qualifying project;

(4) The eligibility of the facility for accelerated selection, review, and documentation timelines under the local government's guidelines;

(5) Benefits to the public;

(6) The private entity's compliance with a minority business enterprise participation plan;

(7) The private entity's plans to employ local contractors and residents; and

(8) Other criteria that the local government deems appropriate.

(d) After ranking the proposals, the local government shall begin negotiations with the first ranked private entity. If the local government and the first ranked private entity do not reach a comprehensive agreement or interim agreement, then the local government may conduct negotiations with the next ranked private entity. This process shall continue until the local government either voluntarily abandons the process or executes a comprehensive agreement or interim agreement with a private entity.

(e) At any time during the process outlined in this Code section but before the full execution of a comprehensive agreement, the local government may, without liability to any private entity or third party, cancel its request for proposals or reject all proposals received in response to its request for proposals, including the unsolicited proposal, for any reason whatsoever.

(f) Nothing in this article shall enlarge, diminish, or affect the authority, if any, otherwise possessed by the local government to take action that would impact the debt capacity of the State of Georgia or any local government. The credit of this state shall not be pledged or loaned to any private entity. The local government shall not loan money to the private entity in order to finance all or a portion of the qualifying project. A multiyear lease entered into by a local government which is not terminable at the end of each fiscal year during the term of the lease shall be considered a debt of the local government which enters into such lease, and such lease shall apply against the debt limitations of the local government.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-114, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 406, § 2/SB 59.)

36-91-115. Comprehensive agreement.

Statute text

(a) The comprehensive agreement entered into between the local government and the private entity selected in accordance with this article shall include:

(1) A thorough description of the duties of each party in the completion and operation of the qualifying project;

(2) Dates and schedules for the completion of the qualifying project;

(3) Any user fees, lease payments, or service payments as may be established by agreement of the parties, as well as any process for changing such fees or payments throughout the term of the agreement, and a copy of any service contract;

(4) Any reimbursements to be paid to the local government for services provided by the local government;

(5) A process for the review of plans and specifications for the qualifying project by the local government and approval by the local government if the plans and specifications conform to reasonable standards acceptable to the local government;

(6) A process for the periodic and final inspection of the qualifying project by the local government to ensure that the private entity's activities are in accordance with the provisions of the comprehensive agreement;

(7) Delivery of performance and payment bonds in the amounts required in Code Sections 36-91-70 and 36-91-90 and in a form acceptable to the local government for those components of the qualifying project that involve construction, and surety bonds, letters of credit, or other forms of security acceptable to the local government for other phases and components of the development of the qualifying project;

(8) Submission of a policy or policies of public liability insurance, copies of which shall be filed with the local government accompanied by proofs of coverage, or self-insurance, each in form and amount satisfactory to the local government and reasonably sufficient to ensure coverage of tort liability to the public and employees and to enable the continued operation of the qualifying project;

(9) A process for monitoring the practices of the private entity by the local government to ensure that the qualifying project is properly maintained;

(10) The filing of appropriate financial statements to the local government on a periodic basis; and

(11) Provisions governing the rights and responsibilities of the local government and the private entity in the event that the comprehensive agreement is terminated or there is a material default by the private entity, including conditions governing assumption of the duties and responsibilities of the private entity by the local government and the transfer or purchase of property or other interests of the private entity by the local government, including provisions compliant with state constitutional limitations on public debt by the local government. Such policies and procedures shall be consistent with Code Section 36-91-116.

(b) The comprehensive agreement may include such other terms and conditions that the local government determines will serve the public purpose of this article and to which the private entity and the local government mutually agree, including, without limitation, provisions regarding unavoidable delays and provisions where the authority and duties of the private entity under this article shall cease and the qualifying project is dedicated to the local government for public use.

(c) Any changes in the terms of the comprehensive agreement, as may be agreed upon by the parties from time to time, shall be added to the comprehensive agreement by written amendment.

(d) The comprehensive agreement may provide for the development of phases or segments of the qualifying project.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-115, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 406, § 2/SB 59.)

36-91-116. Default and remedies.

Statute text

(a) In the event of a material default by the private entity, the local government may terminate, with cause, the comprehensive agreement and exercise any other rights and remedies that may be available to it at law or in equity, including, but not limited to, claims under the maintenance, performance, or payment bonds; other forms of security; or letters of credit required by Code Section 36-91-115.

(b) The local government may elect to assume the responsibilities and duties of the private entity of the qualifying project, and in such case, it shall succeed to all of the right, title, and interest in such qualifying project subject to statutory limitations on the availability of future appropriated or otherwise unobligated funds.

(c) The power of eminent domain shall not be delegated to any private entity with respect to any project commenced or proposed pursuant to this article. Any local government having the power of condemnation under state law may exercise such power of condemnation to acquire the qualifying project in the event of a material default by the private entity. Any person who has perfected a security interest in the qualifying project may participate in the condemnation proceedings with the standing of a property owner.

(d) In the event the local government elects to take over a qualifying project pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section, the local government may develop the qualifying project, impose user fees, and impose and collect lease payments for the use thereof.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-116, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 406, § 2/SB 59.)

36-91-117. Powers.

Statute text

All power or authority granted by this article to public entities shall be in addition and supplemental to, and not in substitution for, the powers conferred by any other general, special, or local law. The limitations imposed by this article shall not affect the powers conferred by any other general, special, or local law and shall apply only to the extent that a local government elects to proceed under this article.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-117, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 406, § 2/SB 59.)

36-91-118. Sovereign or official immunity.

Statute text

Nothing in this article shall be construed as or deemed a waiver of the sovereign or official immunity of any local government or any officer or employee thereof with respect to the participation in, or approval of, all or any part of the qualifying project or its operation, including, but not limited to, interconnection of the qualifying project with any other infrastructure or project.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-118, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 406, § 2/SB 59.)

36-91-119. Article inapplicable to local government procurement via competitive sealed bidding; article inapplicable to certain transportation projects; public meeting requirements.

Statute text

(a) Local governments that proceed with procurement pursuant to competitive sealed bidding as defined in Code Section 36-91-2, or any other purchasing options available under current law, shall not be required to comply with this article.

(b) Nothing in this article shall apply to or affect the State Transportation Board, the Department of Transportation, or the State Road and Tollway Authority, or any project thereof.

(c) Nothing in this article shall abrogate the obligations of a local government or private entity to comply with the public meetings requirement in accordance with Chapter 14 of Title 50 or to disclose public information in accordance with Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-91-119, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 406, § 2/SB 59.)

——————————

CHAPTER 92

WAIVER OF IMMUNITY FOR MOTOR VEHICLE CLAIMS

Sec.

36-92-1. Definitions.

36-92-2. Maximum waiver amount; exceptions; liability; recovery of interest.

36-92-3. No employee liability; parties to litigation; evidence; bar to further recovery.

36-92-4. Regulation of settlement of actions against local government entities; exclusion of punitive and exemplary damages; rules of disclosure of documents; recovery against local governments; jurisdiction.

36-92-5. Applicability.

Annotations

Law reviews. - For note on the 2002 enactment of this chapter, see 19 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 243 (2002).

36-92-1. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1) "Claim" means any demand against a local government entity for money for a loss caused by negligence of a local government entity officer or employee using a covered motor vehicle while carrying out his or her official duties or employment.

(2) "Covered" motor vehicle means:

(A) Any motor vehicle owned by the local government entity; and

(B) Any motor vehicle leased or rented by the local government entity.

(3) "Local government entity" means any county, municipal corporation, or consolidated city-county government of this state. Such term shall not include a local school system.

(4) "Local government officer or employee" means:

(A) An officer, agent, servant, attorney, or employee of a local government entity; or

(B) A sheriff, deputy sheriff, or other agent, servant, or employee of a sheriff's office.

(5) "Loss" means personal injury, disease, death, damage to tangible property, including lost wages and economic loss to the person who suffered the injury, disease, or death; pain and suffering; mental anguish; loss of consortium; and any other element of actual damages recoverable in actions for negligence.

(6) "Motor vehicle" means any automobile, bus, motorcycle, truck, trailer, or semitrailer, including its equipment, and any other equipment permanently attached thereto, designed or licensed for use on the public streets, roads, and highways of the state.

(7) "Occurrence" means an accident involving a covered motor vehicle.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-92-1, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 579, § 3; Ga. L. 2019, p. 781, § 1/SB 29.)

Annotations

The 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, rewrote paragraph (4), which read: " 'Local government officer or employee' means an officer, agent, servant, attorney, or employee of a local government entity."

Law reviews. - For annual survey on local government law, see 65 Mercer L. Rev. 205 (2013). For article, "What's the 'Use': Vehicle Maintenance Liability Barred by Sovereign Immunity Amendment Intended to Promote Waiver," see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 651 (2018).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Definition of "motor vehicle" does not apply to § 33-24-51(b). - In determining if a county waived the county's sovereign immunity through the voluntary purchase of liability insurance under the second sentence of O.C.G.A. § 33-24-51(b), a trial court erred in considering the definition of "motor vehicle" provided in O.C.G.A. § 36-92-1; rather, "any motor vehicle" was defined as a vehicle that was capable of being driven on the public roads that was covered by a liability insurance policy purchased by the county. Glass v. Gates, 311 Ga. App. 563, 716 S.E.2d 611 (2011), aff'd, 291 Ga. 350, 729 S.E.2d 361 (2012).

Motor vehicle. - When a local entity purchases automobile liability insurance in an amount greater than the prescribed limits set forth for a waiver of sovereign immunity under O.C.G.A. § 36-92-1 et seq., the entity waives sovereign immunity to the extent of the entity's insurance coverage as required by O.C.G.A. § 33-24-51(b), and the broad definition of "any motor vehicle" set forth in § 33-24-51 applies. Therefore, in a wrongful death and survivor case, a county waived sovereign immunity to the extent of the county's insurance coverage as required by O.C.G.A. § 33-24-51(b), and the Georgia legislature did not intend to apply a narrow definition of motor vehicle under O.C.G.A. § 36-92-1 in a case involving an injury caused by a bush hog and a tractor. Gates v. Glass, 291 Ga. 350, 729 S.E.2d 361 (2012).

School district waived immunity to extent of insurance covering school bus accident. - In a parent's action against a school district for the death of the parent's child as the child tried to board a school bus, although the district had sovereign immunity, the district waived sovereign immunity to the extent of the district's purchase of liability insurance pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 33-24-51(b); the exclusion from the waiver of sovereign immunity for school districts in O.C.G.A. § 36-92-2(a) did not extend to the second sentence of § 33-24-51(b). Tift County Sch. Dist. v. Martinez, 331 Ga. App. 423, 771 S.E.2d 117 (2015), cert. denied, No. S15C1084, 2015 Ga. LEXIS 458 (Ga. 2015).

"Local government entity" includes sheriffs' offices. - Term "local government entity" should not be construed so narrowly as to exclude sheriffs' offices, which though separate from a county itself, nevertheless, clearly performs governmental services on a local level. Davis v. Morrison, 344 Ga. App. 527, 810 S.E.2d 649 (2018).

Summary judgment was properly granted to the deputy as the deputy was not subject to liability for the automobile accident and the plaintiff's claims against the deputy were barred because the term "local government entity" included sheriffs' offices; any local government officer or employee who committed a tort involving the use of a covered motor vehicle while in the performance of the employee's official duties was not subject to lawsuit or liability; and the deputy was employed as a county sheriff's deputy and the deputy was driving a county-owned vehicle en route to the sheriff's office's evidence room where the deputy worked as an evidence custodian when the accident with the plaintiff occurred. Davis v. Morrison, 344 Ga. App. 527, 810 S.E.2d 649 (2018).

In an action by parents that was erroneously brought against a county arising out of a deputy sheriff's high-speed chase, because the deputy was employed by the sheriff rather than the county, the parents' argument that the parents could sue the county based upon the waiver of sovereign immunity for motor vehicle claims found in O.C.G.A. § 36-92-1 et seq. was rejected; the term "local government entity" in O.C.G.A. § 36-92-3(b) had been interpreted to include sheriff's offices. Cannon v. Oconee County, 353 Ga. App. 296, 835 S.E.2d 753 (2019).

Cited in Hewell v. Walton County, 292 Ga. App. 510, 664 S.E.2d 875 (2008); Strength v. Lovett, 311 Ga. App. 35, 714 S.E.2d 723 (2011); Bd. of Comm'rs v. Johnson, 311 Ga. App. 867, 717 S.E.2d 272 (2011); City of Atlanta v. Mitcham, 296 Ga. 576, 769 S.E.2d 320 (2015).

36-92-2. Maximum waiver amount; exceptions; liability; recovery of interest.

Statute text

(a) The sovereign immunity of local government entities for a loss arising out of claims for the negligent use of a covered motor vehicle is waived up to the following limits:

(1) $100,000.00 because of bodily injury or death of any one person in any one occurrence, an aggregate amount of $300,000.00 because of bodily injury or death of two or more persons in any one occurrence, and $50,000.00 because of injury to or destruction of property in any one occurrence, for incidents occurring on or after January 1, 2005, and until December 31, 2006;

(2) $250,000.00 because of bodily injury or death of any one person in any one occurrence, an aggregate amount of $450,000.00 because of bodily injury or death of two or more persons in any one occurrence, and $50,000.00 because of injury to or destruction of property in any one occurrence, for incidents occurring on or after January 1, 2007, and until December 31, 2007; and

(3) $500,000.00 because of bodily injury or death of any one person in any one occurrence, an aggregate amount of $700,000.00 because of bodily injury or death of two or more persons in any one occurrence, and $50,000.00 because of injury to or destruction of property in any one occurrence, for incidents occurring on or after January 1, 2008.

(b) The sovereign immunity of local government entities for a loss arising out of claims for the negligent use of a covered motor vehicle is waived only to the extent and in the manner provided in this chapter and only with respect to actions brought in the courts of this state. This chapter shall not be construed to affect any claim or cause of action otherwise permitted by law and for which the defense of sovereign immunity is not available.

(c) Local government entities shall have no liability for losses resulting from conduct on any part of local government officers or employees which was not within the scope of their official duties or employment.

(d) The waiver provided by this chapter shall be increased to the extent that:

(1) The governing body of the local governmental entity by resolution or ordinance voluntarily adopts a higher waiver;

(2) The local government entity becomes a member of an interlocal risk management agency created pursuant to Chapter 85 of this title to the extent that coverage obtained exceeds the amount of the waiver set forth in this Code section; or

(3) The local government entity purchases commercial liability insurance in an amount in excess of the waiver set forth in this Code section.

(e) Interest prior to judgment may be recovered pursuant to the "Unliquidated Damages Interest Act" as provided for in Code Section 51-12-14; however, any recovery of interest prior to judgment shall be included within the applicable aggregate amount per occurrence as set forth in this Code section.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-92-2, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 579, § 3.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2002, a comma was added following "January 1, 2005" in paragraph (a)(1) and following "January 1, 2007" in paragraph (a)(2).

Law reviews. - For survey article on insurance law, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 191 (2008). For article, "What's the 'Use': Vehicle Maintenance Liability Barred by Sovereign Immunity Amendment Intended to Promote Waiver," see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 651 (2018).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Notice to county sheriff. - Trial court erred in denying the defendants' motion to dismiss on the ground that the plaintiff's claim against the sheriff was barred by the plaintiff's failure to provide the Sheriff's Office with notice of such claim under O.C.G.A. § 36-11-1 because the plaintiff was legally precluded from even naming the county as the proper defendant, and given that § 36-11-1 did not mandate otherwise, presentment of a claim for which the sheriff can be held vicariously liable must be directed to the sheriff. Moats v. Mendez, 349 Ga. App. 811, 824 S.E.2d 808 (2019).

Sovereign immunity not waived. - In an action arising out of an arrest, despite the way the arrestee was treated, the trial court properly dismissed a complaint against a county, and granted summary judgment on the same complaint against a city, on sovereign immunity grounds since the arrestee failed to show that the immunity had been waived. Scott v. City of Valdosta, 280 Ga. App. 481, 634 S.E.2d 472 (2006).

Trial court erred in denying a county's motion for summary judgment in a driver's action alleging that the county was negligent for failing to maintain and repair a roadway or failing to warn of a known hazard because there was no evidence that the county waived the county's sovereign immunity under O.C.G.A. § 36-92-2, and there was no evidence that a county vehicle caused the hole in the roadway; the plaintiff, not the defendants, has the burden of establishing that a county has waived sovereign immunity by purchasing liability insurance protection covering the plaintiff's claim. Effingham County v. Rhodes, 307 Ga. App. 504, 705 S.E.2d 856 (2010).

Trial court erred in denying a county and a county commissioner summary judgment in a driver's action alleging that the county and the commissioner were negligent for failing to maintain and repair a roadway or failing to warn of a known hazard because a suit against the commissioner in the commissioner's official capacity was a claim against the county, and the commissioner could raise any defense available to the county, including sovereign immunity; the driver advanced no argument that an act of the General Assembly specifically waived the sovereign immunity protecting the commissioner. Effingham County v. Rhodes, 307 Ga. App. 504, 705 S.E.2d 856 (2010).

Bus driver failed to show that the waiver of sovereign immunity under O.C.G.A. § 36-92-2(a) for the negligent use of motor vehicles applied to the driver's claims for wrongful discharge, false arrest, and malicious prosecution because the school district's alleged liability for those claims was not predicated upon the school district's negligent use of a motor vehicle. Bomia v. Ben Hill County Sch. Dist., 320 Ga. App. 423, 740 S.E.2d 185 (2013).

Waiver of immunity. - When a local entity purchases automobile liability insurance in an amount greater than the prescribed limits set forth for a waiver of sovereign immunity under O.C.G.A. § 36-92-1 et seq., the entity waives sovereign immunity to the extent of the entity's insurance coverage as required by O.C.G.A. § 33-24-51(b), and the broad definition of "any motor vehicle" set forth in § 33-24-51 applies. Therefore, in a wrongful death and survivor case, a county waived sovereign immunity to the extent of the county's insurance coverage as required by § 33-24-51(b), and the Georgia legislature did not intend to apply a narrow definition of motor vehicle under O.C.G.A. § 36-92-1 when the case involved an injury caused by a bush hog and a tractor. Gates v. Glass, 291 Ga. 350, 729 S.E.2d 361 (2012).

School district waived immunity to extent of insurance covering school bus accident. - In a parent's action against a school district for the death of the parent's child as the child tried to board a school bus, although the district had sovereign immunity, the district waived sovereign immunity to the extent of the district's purchase of liability insurance pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 33-24-51(b); the exclusion from the waiver of sovereign immunity for school districts in O.C.G.A. § 36-92-2(a) did not extend to the second sentence of § 33-24-51(b). Tift County Sch. Dist. v. Martinez, 331 Ga. App. 423, 771 S.E.2d 117 (2015), cert. denied, No. S15C1084, 2015 Ga. LEXIS 458 (Ga. 2015).
